Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB600.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of
$26,000,000 in fiscal year 2024-2025 to the Support Education Excellence in Kentucky
(SEEK) Program budget unit from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established
by KRS 48.705.
Section 2. Whereas funding for education initiatives is imperative for the
betterment of the Commonwealth, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes
effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a
law.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/14/2025 3:07 PM Jacketed